es: Material de fricción de las zapatas de freno: A base de carbono; Cerámica; Sin cobre; Kevlar/aramida; Bajo en metal NAO; Orgánico (NAO); Semimetálico; Metal sinterizado; Otro
lt-LT: Stabdžių kaladėlės trinties medžiaga: Anglies pagrindo; Keramika; Be vario; „Kevlar“ / aramidas; Mažo metalingumo NAO; Organinė (NAO); Pusiau metalinė; Sukepinto metalo; Kita
sl-SI: Torni material zavornih čeljusti: Na osnovi karbona; Keramika; Brez bakra; Kevlar/aramid; Nizkokovinski NAO; Organsko (NAO); Polkovinski; Sintrana kovina; Drugo
vi: Vật liệu ma sát của má phanh: Gốc carbon; Gốm; Không chứa đồng; Kevlar/aramid; NAO ít kim loại; Hữu cơ (NAO); Bán kim loại; Kim loại thiêu kết; Khác
de: Reibmaterial für Bremsbacken: Carbonbasiert; Keramik; Kupferfrei; Kevlar/Aramid; Low-Metallic (NAO); Organisch (NAO); Halbmetallisch; Sintermetall; Sonstige
en: Brake shoe friction material: Carbon-based; Ceramic; Copper-free; Kevlar/aramid; Low-metal NAO; Organic (NAO); Semi-metallic; Sintered metal; Other
hu: Fékpofa súrlódóanyaga: Karbonalapú; Kerámia; Rézmentes; Kevlar/aramid; Alacsony fémtartalmú NAO; Organikus (NAO); Félfémes; Szinterezett fém; Egyéb
sk-SK: Trecí materiál brzdových čeľustí: Na báze karbónu; Keramický; Bez medi; Kevlar/aramid; Nízkometalický NAO; Organický (NAO); Polometalický; Spekaný kov (Sintrovaný); Iný
hr-HR: Materijal za trenje kočionih papuča: Na bazi ugljika; Keramika; Bez bakra; Kevlar/aramid; Niskometalni NAO; Organski (NAO); Polumetalik; Sinterirani metal; Ostalo
pl: Materiał cierny szczęki hamulcowe: Na bazie włókna węglowego; Ceramiczny; Bez miedzi; Kevlar/aramid; Niskometaliczny NAO; Organiczny (NAO); Półmetaliczny; Metal spiekany; Inne
ko: 브레이크 슈 마찰재: 카본 기반; 세라믹; 구리 무첨가; Kevlar/아라미드; 로우 메탈 NAO; 유기질(NAO); 세미 메탈릭; 소결 금속; 기타
ro-RO: Material de fricțiune pentru saboții de frână: Pe bază de carbon; Ceramică; Fără cupru; Kevlar/aramidă; NAO cu conținut redus de metal; Organic (NAO); Semimetalic; Metal sinterizat; Altele
th: วัสดุผิวเสียดทานก้ามเบรกแบบดรัม: คาร์บอน; เซรามิก; ไร้ทองแดง; Kevlar/อะรามิด; NAO โลหะต่ำ; ออร์แกนิก (NAO); กึ่งโลหะ; โลหะซินเทอร์; อื่นๆ
nl: Remschoen wrijvingsmateriaal: Op koolstofbasis; Keramisch; Kopervrij; Kevlar/aramide; Laag-metallisch NAO; Organisch (NAO); Semimetallisch; Gesinterd metaal; Overig
pt-BR: Material de fricção da sapata de freio: À base de carbono; Cerâmica; Sem cobre; Kevlar/aramida; NAO com baixo teor de metal; Orgânico (NAO); Semimetálico; Metal sinterizado; Outro
bg-BG: Фрикционен материал на спирачните челюсти: На карбонова основа; Керамика; Без съдържание на мед; Kevlar/арамид; Нискометална (NAO); Органична (NAO); Полуметална; Синтерован метал; Други
it: materiale d'attrito delle ganasce dei freni: A base di carbonio; Ceramica; Senza rame; Kevlar/aramide; NAO a basso contenuto metallico; Organico (NAO); Semimetallico; Metallo sinterizzato; Altro
fr: Matériau de friction des mâchoires de frein: À base de carbone; Céramique; Sans cuivre; Kevlar/aramide; Faible teneur en métal NAO; Organique (NAO); Semi-métallique; Métal fritté; Autre
da: Friktionsmateriale til bremseklodser: Carbonbaseret; Keramisk; Kobberfri; Kevlar/aramid; Lavmetallisk NAO; Organisk (NAO); Semimetallisk; Sintermetal; Andet
sv: Bromsbackens friktionsmaterial: Kolfiberbaserad; Keramisk; Kopparfri; Kevlar/aramid; Lågmetallisk (NAO); Organisk (NAO); Semimetallisk; Sintrad metall; Övrigt
nb: Bremseskoens friksjonsmateriale: Karbonbasert; Keramisk; Kobberfri; Kevlar/aramid; Lavmetallisk NAO; Organisk (NAO); Semimetallisk; Sintret metall; Annet
tr: Fren pabucu sürtünme malzemesi: Karbon bazlı; Seramik; Bakırsız; Kevlar/aramid; Düşük metalik NAO; Organik (NAO); Yarı metalik; Sinterli metal; Diğer
ja: ブレーキシュー摩擦素材: カーボンベース; セラミック; カッパーフリー; Kevlar/アラミド; ロースチールNAO; オーガニック (NAO); セミメタル; 焼結合金 (シンタード); その他
zh-CN: 制动蹄摩擦材料: 碳基; 陶瓷; 无铜; Kevlar/芳纶; 低金属 NAO; 有机 (NAO); 半金属; 烧结金属; 其他
cs: Třecí materiál brzdové čelisti: Na bázi karbonu; Keramika; Bez mědi; Kevlar/aramid; Nízkometalické NAO; Organické (NAO); Polometalické; Slinutý kov; Jiné
ru: Фрикционный материал тормозных колодок: На основе карбона; Керамика; Без меди; Kevlar/арамид; Низкометаллический NAO; Органический (NAO); Полуметалл; Спеченный металл; Другое
zh-TW: 煞車塊摩擦材質: 碳基; 陶瓷; 無銅; Kevlar/芳綸; 低金屬 NAO; 有機 (NAO); 半金屬; 燒結金屬; 其他
pt-PT: Material de fricção da sapata de travão: À base de carbono; Cerâmica; Sem cobre; Kevlar/aramida; NAO baixo em metal; Orgânico (NAO); Semimetálico; Metal sinterizado; Outro
el: Υλικό τριβής σιαγόνας φρένου: Με βάση τον άνθρακα; Κεραμικό; Χωρίς χαλκό; Kevlar/αραμίδιο; Χαμηλής περιεκτικότητας σε μέταλλο (NAO); Οργανικό (NAO); Ημιμεταλλικό; Πυροσυσσωματωμένο μέταλλο; Άλλο
fi: Jarrukengän kitkamateriaali: Hiilipohjainen; Keraaminen; Kupariton; Kevlar/aramidi; Vähämetallinen NAO; Orgaaninen (NAO); Puolimetallinen; Sintrattu metalli; Muu